California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 1.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

101.

The department is comprised of the following:

(a) The Dental Board of California.

(b) The Medical Board of California.

(c) The California State Board of Optometry.

(d) The California State Board of Pharmacy.

(e) The Veterinary Medical Board.

(f) The California Board of Accountancy.

(g) The California Architects Board.

(h) The State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology.

(i) The Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists.

(j) The Contractors State License Board.

(k) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(l) The Bureau of Household Goods and Services.

(m) The Board of Registered Nursing.

(n) The Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(o) The State Athletic Commission.

(p) The Cemetery and Funeral
 Bureau.

(q) The Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(r) The Court Reporters Board of California.

(s) The Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians.

(t) The Landscape Architects Technical Committee.

(u) The Division of Investigation.

(v) The Bureau of Automotive Repair.

(w) The Respiratory Care Board of California.

(x) The Acupuncture Board.

(y) The Board of Psychology.

(z) The Podiatric Medical Board of California.

(aa) The Physical Therapy Board of California.

(ab) The Arbitration Review Program.

(ac) The Physician Assistant Board.

(ad) The Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board.

(ae) The California Board of Occupational Therapy.

(af) The Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(ag) The
 California Board of Naturopathic Medicine.

(ah) The Dental Hygiene Board of California.

(ai) The Professional Fiduciaries Bureau.

(aj) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.

(ak) The Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers.

(al) The Structural Pest Control Board.

(am) Any other boards, offices, or officers subject to its jurisdiction by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 414, Sec. 1.   (AB 2685)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

101.6.

The boards, bureaus, and commissions in the department are established for the purpose of ensuring that those private businesses and professions deemed to engage in activities which have potential impact upon the public health, safety, and welfare are adequately regulated in order to protect the people of California.

To this end, they establish minimum qualifications and levels of competency and license persons desiring to engage in the occupations they regulate upon determining that such persons possess the requisite skills and qualifications necessary to provide safe and effective services to the public, or register or otherwise certify persons in order to identify practitioners and ensure performance according to set and accepted professional standards. They provide a means for redress of grievances by investigating allegations of unprofessional conduct, incompetence, fraudulent action, or unlawful activity brought to their attention by members of the public and institute disciplinary action against persons licensed or registered under the provisions of this code when such action is warranted. In addition, they conduct periodic checks of licensees, registrants, or otherwise certified persons in order to ensure compliance with the relevant sections of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

101.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, boards shall meet at least two times each calendar year. Boards shall meet at least once each calendar year in northern California and once each calendar year in southern California in order to facilitate participation by the public and its licensees.

(b) The director has discretion to exempt any board from the requirement in subdivision (a) upon a showing of good cause that the board is not able to meet at least two times in a calendar year.

(c) The director may call for a special meeting of the board when a board is not fulfilling its duties.

(d) An agency within the department that is required to provide a written notice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11125 of the Government Code, may provide that notice by regular mail, email, or by both regular mail and email. An agency shall give a person who requests a notice the option of receiving the notice by regular mail, email, or by both regular mail and email. The agency shall comply with the requester’s chosen form or forms of notice.

(e) An agency that plans to webcast a meeting shall include in the meeting notice required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11125 of the Government Code a statement of the board’s intent to webcast the meeting. An agency may webcast a meeting even if the agency fails to include that statement of intent in the
 notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 9.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

Upon the request of any board regulating, licensing, or controlling any professional or vocational occupation created by an initiative act, the Director of Consumer Affairs may take over the duties of the board under the same conditions and in the same manner as provided in this code for other boards of like character. Such boards shall pay a proportionate cost of the administration of the department on the same basis as is charged other boards included within the department. Upon request from any such board which has adopted the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code as rules of procedure in proceedings before it, the director shall assign hearing officers for such proceedings in accordance with Section 110.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

102.3.

(a) The director may enter into an interagency agreement with an appropriate entity within the Department of Consumer Affairs as provided for in Section 101 to delegate the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction that have been succeeded and vested with the department, of a board, as defined in Section 477, which became inoperative and was repealed in accordance with Chapter 908 of the Statutes of 1994.

(b) (1) Where, pursuant to subdivision (a), an interagency agreement is entered into between the director and that entity, the entity receiving the delegation of authority may establish a technical
 committee to regulate, as directed by the entity, the profession subject to the authority that has been delegated. The entity may delegate to the technical committee only those powers that it received pursuant to the interagency agreement with the director. The technical committee shall have only those powers that have been delegated to it by the entity.

(2) Where the entity delegates its authority to adopt, amend, or repeal regulations to the technical committee, all regulations adopted, amended, or repealed by the technical committee shall be subject to the review and approval of the entity.

(3) The entity shall not delegate to a technical committee its authority to discipline a licensee who has violated the provisions of the applicable chapter of the Business and Professions Code that
 is subject to the director’s delegation of authority to the entity.

(c) An interagency agreement entered into, pursuant to subdivision (a), shall continue until such time as the licensing program administered by the technical committee has undergone a review by the Assembly Committee on Business and Professions and the Senate Committee on Business, Professions and Economic Development to evaluate and determine whether the licensing program has demonstrated a public need for its continued existence. Thereafter, at the director’s discretion, the interagency agreement may be renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 10.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

103.

Each member of a board, commission, or committee created in the various chapters of Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) and Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000), and in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18600) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 8, shall receive the moneys specified in this section when authorized by the respective provisions.

Each such member shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day actually spent in the discharge of official duties, and shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties.

The payments
 in each instance shall be made only from the fund from which the expenses of the agency are paid and shall be subject to the availability of money.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no public officer or employee shall receive per diem salary compensation for serving on those boards, commissions, or committees on any day when the officer or employee also received compensation for the officer or employee’s regular public employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 11.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

104.

All boards or other regulatory entities within the department’s jurisdiction that the department determines to be health-related may adopt regulations to require licensees to display their licenses or registrations in the locality in which they are treating patients, and to inform patients as to the identity of the regulatory agency they may contact if they have any questions or complaints regarding the licensee. In complying with this requirement, those boards may take into consideration the particular settings in which licensees practice, or other circumstances which may make the displaying or providing of information to the consumer extremely difficult for the licensee in their particular type of practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 991, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

Members of boards in the department shall take an oath of office as provided in the Constitution and the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

105.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, each member of a board, commission, examining committee, or other similarly constituted agency within the department shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of that member’s successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever first occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 12.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

106.

The appointing authority has power to remove from office at any time any member of any board appointed by the appointing authority for continued neglect of duties required by law, or for incompetence, or unprofessional or
 dishonorable conduct. Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation or restriction on the power of the
 appointing authority conferred on the appointing authority by any other provision of law to remove any member of any board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 13.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

106.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Governor may remove from office a member of a board or other licensing entity in the department if it is shown that such member has knowledge of the specific questions to be asked on the licensing entity’s next examination and directly or indirectly discloses any such question or questions in advance of or during the examination to any applicant for that examination.

The proceedings for removal shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the Governor shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

107.

Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution, each board may appoint a person exempt from civil service, who shall be designated as an executive officer unless the licensing act of the particular board designates the person as a registrar, and may fix that person’s salary, with the approval of the Department of Human Resources pursuant to Section 19825 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 1.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

107.5.

If any board in the department uses an official seal pursuant to any provision of this code, the seal shall contain the words “State of California” and “Department of Consumer Affairs” in addition to the title of the board, and shall be in a form approved by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

108.

Each of the boards comprising the department exists as a separate unit, and has the functions of setting standards, holding meetings, and setting dates thereof, preparing and conducting examinations, passing upon applicants, conducting investigations of violations of laws under its jurisdiction, issuing citations and holding hearings for the revocation of licenses, and the imposing of penalties following those hearings, insofar as these powers are given by statute to each respective board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

108.5.

In any investigation, proceeding, or hearing that any board, commission, or officer in the department is empowered to institute, conduct, or hold, any witness appearing at the investigation, proceeding, or hearing whether upon a subpoena or voluntarily, may be paid the sum of twelve dollars ($12) per day for every day in actual attendance at the investigation, proceeding, or hearing and for the witness’s actual, necessary, and reasonable expenses and those sums shall be a legal charge against the funds of the respective board, commission, or officer; provided further, that no witness appearing other than at the instance of the board, commission, or officer may be compensated out of the fund.

The board, commission, or officer shall determine the sums due to any witness and enter the amount on its minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 15.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

109.

(a) The decisions of any of the boards comprising the department with respect to setting standards, conducting examinations, passing candidates, and revoking licenses, are not subject to review by the director, but are final within the limits provided by this code which are applicable to the particular board, except as provided in this section. 

(b) The director may initiate an investigation of any allegations of misconduct in the preparation, administration, or scoring of an examination which is administered by a board, or in the review of qualifications which are a part of the licensing process of any board. A request for investigation shall be made by the director to the Division of Investigation through the chief of the division or to any law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the alleged misconduct occurred. 

(c) The director may intervene in any matter of any board where an investigation by the Division of Investigation discloses probable cause to believe that the conduct or activity of a board, or its members or employees constitutes a violation of criminal law.

The term “intervene,” as used in paragraph (c) of this section may include, but is not limited to, an application for a restraining order or injunctive relief as specified in Section 123.5, or a referral or request for criminal prosecution. For purposes of this section, the director shall be deemed to have standing under Section 123.5 and shall seek representation of the Attorney General, or other appropriate counsel in the event of a conflict in pursuing that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1013, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

110.

The department shall have possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, funds, appropriations, land and other property—real or personal—now or hereafter held for the benefit or use of all of the bodies, offices or officers comprising the department. The title to all property held by any of these bodies, offices or officers for the use and benefit of the state, is vested in the State of California to be held in the possession of the department. Except as authorized by a board, the department shall not have the possession and control of examination questions prior to submission to applicants at scheduled examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

111.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, any board may, with the approval of the appointing power, appoint qualified persons, who shall be designated as commissioners on examination, to give the whole or any portion of any examination. A commissioner on examination need not be a member of the board but shall have the same qualifications as one and shall be subject to the same rules.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 16.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

112.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, no agency in the department, with the exception of the Board for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors, shall be required to compile, publish, sell, or otherwise distribute a directory. When an agency deems it necessary to compile and publish a directory, the agency shall cooperate with the director in determining its form and content, the time and frequency of its publication, the persons to whom it is to be sold or otherwise distributed, and its price if it is sold. Any agency that requires the approval of the director for the compilation, publication, or distribution of a directory, under the law in effect at the time the amendment made to this section at the 1970 Regular Session of the Legislature becomes effective, shall continue to require that approval. As used in this section, “directory” means a directory, roster, register, or similar compilation of the names of persons who hold a license, certificate, permit, registration, or similar indicia of authority from the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 59, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

113.

Upon recommendation of the director, officers, and employees of the department, and the officers, members, and employees of the boards, committees, and commissions comprising it or subject to its jurisdiction may confer, in this state or elsewhere, with officers or employees of this state, its political subdivisions, other states, or the United States, or with other persons, associations, or organizations as may be of assistance to the department, board, committee, or commission in the conduct of its work. The officers, members, and employees shall be entitled to their actual traveling expenses incurred in pursuance hereof, but when these expenses are incurred with respect to travel outside of the state, they shall be subject to the approval of the Governor and the Director of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

114.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, any licensee or registrant of any board, commission, or bureau within the department whose license expired while the licensee or registrant was on active duty as a member of the California National Guard or the United States Armed Forces, may, upon application, reinstate their license or registration without examination or penalty, provided that all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The licensee or registrant’s license or registration was valid at the time they entered the California National Guard or the United States Armed Forces.

(2) The application
 for reinstatement is made while serving in the California National Guard or the United States Armed Forces, or not later than one year from the date of discharge from active service or return to inactive military status.

(3) The application for reinstatement is accompanied by an affidavit showing the date of entrance into the service, whether still in the service, or date of discharge, and the renewal fee for the current renewal period in which the application is filed is paid.

(b) If application for reinstatement is filed more than one year after discharge or return to inactive status, the applicant, in the discretion of the licensing agency, may be required to pass an examination.

(c) If application for reinstatement is
 filed and the licensing agency determines that the applicant has not actively engaged in the practice of the applicant’s profession while on active duty, then the licensing agency may require the applicant to pass an examination.

(d) Unless otherwise specifically provided in this code, any licensee or registrant who, either part time or full time, practices in this state the profession or vocation for which the licensee or registrant is licensed or registered shall be required to maintain their license in good standing even though the licensee or registrant is in military service.

For the purposes in this section, time spent by a licensee in receiving treatment or hospitalization in any veterans’ facility during which the licensee is prevented from practicing the licensee’s profession or
 vocation shall be excluded from said period of one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 17.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

114.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, every board, as defined in Section 22, within the department shall waive the renewal fees, continuing education requirements, and other renewal requirements as determined by the board, if any are applicable, for a licensee or registrant called to active duty as a member of the United States Armed Forces or the California National Guard if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The licensee or registrant possessed a current and valid license with the board at the time the licensee or registrant was called to active duty.

(2) The renewal requirements are waived only for the period during
 which the licensee or registrant is on active duty service.

(3) Written documentation that substantiates the licensee or registrant’s active duty service is provided to the board.

(b) For purposes of this section, the phrase “called to active duty” shall have the same meaning as “active duty” as defined in Section 101 of Title 10 of the United States Code and shall additionally include individuals who are on active duty in the California National Guard, whether due to proclamation of a state of insurrection pursuant to Section 143 of the Military and Veterans Code or due to a proclamation of a state extreme emergency or when the California National Guard is otherwise on active duty pursuant to Section 146 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(c) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), the licensee or registrant shall not engage in any activities requiring a license during the period that the waivers provided by this section are in effect.

(2) If the licensee or registrant will provide services for which the licensee or registrant is licensed while on active duty, the board shall convert the license status to military active and no private practice of any type shall be permitted.

(d) In order to engage in any activities for which the licensee or registrant is licensed once discharged from active duty, the licensee or registrant shall meet all necessary renewal requirements as determined by the board within six months from the licensee’s or registrant’s date of discharge from active duty service.

(e) After a licensee or registrant receives notice of the licensee or registrant’s discharge date, the licensee or registrant shall notify the board of their discharge from active duty within 60 days of receiving their notice of discharge.

(f) A board may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

(g) This section shall not apply to any board that has a similar license renewal waiver process statutorily authorized for that board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 386, Sec. 1.   (SB 1237)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

114.5.

(a) Each board shall inquire in every application for licensure if the individual applying for licensure is serving in, or has previously served in, the military.

(b) If a board’s governing law authorizes veterans to apply military experience and training towards licensure requirements, that board shall post information on the board’s Internet Web site about
 the ability of veteran applicants to apply military experience and training towards licensure requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 174, Sec. 1.   (SB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

115.

The provisions of Section 114 of this code are also applicable to a licensee or registrant whose license or registration was obtained while in the armed services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1577.)
-------------------------------------------

115.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2016, a board within the department shall expedite, and may assist, the initial licensure process for an applicant who supplies satisfactory evidence to the board that the applicant has served as an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States and was honorably discharged.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2024, a board within the department shall expedite, and may assist, the initial licensure process for an applicant who supplies satisfactory evidence to the board that the applicant is an active duty member of a regular component of the Armed Forces of the United States enrolled in the United
 States Department of Defense SkillBridge program as authorized under Section 1143(e) of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(c) A board may adopt regulations necessary to administer this section in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, the term “applicant” refers to an applicant for an individual license and does not refer to applicants for business or entity licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

115.5.

(a) A board within the department shall expedite the licensure process and waive the licensure application fee and the initial or original license fee charged by the board for an applicant who meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Supplies evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is married to, or in a domestic partnership or other legal union with, an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is assigned to a duty station in this state under official active duty military orders.

(2) Holds a current license in another state, district, or territory of the United States in the profession
 or vocation for which the applicant seeks a license from the board.

(b) A board may adopt regulations necessary to administer this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “applicant” refers to an applicant for an individual license and does not refer to applicants for business or entity licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 2.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

115.6.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (j), a board within the department shall, after appropriate investigation, issue a temporary license to practice a profession or vocation to an applicant who meets the requirements set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(2) Revenues from fees for temporary licenses issued by the California Board of Accountancy shall be credited to the Accountancy Fund in accordance with Section 5132.

(b) The board may conduct an investigation of an applicant for purposes of denying or revoking a temporary license issued pursuant to this section. This investigation may include a
 criminal background check.

(c) An applicant seeking a temporary license pursuant to this section shall meet the following requirements:

(1) The applicant shall supply evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is married to, or in a domestic partnership or other legal union with, an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is assigned to a duty station in this state under official active duty military orders.

(2) The applicant shall hold a current, active, and unrestricted license that confers upon the applicant the authority to practice, in another state, district, or territory of the United States, the profession or vocation within the same scope for which the applicant seeks a
 temporary license from the board.

(3) The applicant shall submit an application to the board that shall include a signed affidavit attesting to the fact that the applicant meets all of the requirements for the temporary license, and that the information submitted in the application is accurate, to the best of the applicant’s knowledge. The application shall also include written verification from the applicant’s original licensing jurisdiction stating that the applicant’s license is in good standing in that jurisdiction.

(4) The applicant shall not have committed an act in any jurisdiction that would have constituted grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of the license under this code at the time the act was committed. A violation of this paragraph may be grounds for the
 denial or revocation of a temporary license issued by the board.

(5) The applicant shall not have been disciplined by a licensing entity in another jurisdiction and shall not be the subject of an unresolved complaint, review procedure, or disciplinary proceeding conducted by a licensing entity in another jurisdiction.

(6) (A) The applicant shall, upon request by a board, furnish a full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting a criminal background check.

(B) The board shall request a fingerprint-based criminal history information check from the Department of Justice in accordance with subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code and the Department of Justice shall furnish state or federal
 criminal history information in accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The applicant shall pass a California law and ethics examination if otherwise required by the board for the profession or vocation for which the applicant seeks licensure.

(e) Except as specified in subdivision (g), a board shall issue a temporary license pursuant to this section within 30 days of receiving documentation that the applicant has met the requirements specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) if the results of the criminal background check do not show grounds for denial.

(f) (1) A temporary license issued pursuant to this section may be immediately terminated upon a finding that the
 temporary licenseholder failed to meet any of the requirements described in subdivision (c) or (d) or provided substantively inaccurate information that would affect the person’s eligibility for temporary licensure. Upon termination of the temporary license, the board shall issue a notice of termination that shall require the temporary
 licenseholder to immediately cease the practice of the licensed profession upon receipt.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, if, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, a board finds that a temporary licenseholder engaged in unprofessional conduct or any other act that is a cause for discipline by the board, the board shall revoke the temporary license.

(g) An applicant seeking a temporary license as a civil engineer, geotechnical engineer, structural engineer, land surveyor, professional geologist, professional geophysicist, certified engineering geologist, or certified hydrogeologist pursuant to this section shall successfully pass the appropriate California-specific examination or examinations required for licensure in those respective professions by the
 Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists. The board shall issue a temporary license pursuant to this subdivision within 30 days of receiving documentation that the applicant has met the requirements specified in this subdivision and subdivisions (c) and (d) if the results of the criminal background check do not show grounds for denial.

(h) A temporary license issued pursuant to this section is nonrenewable and shall expire 12 months after issuance, upon issuance or denial of a standard license, upon issuance or denial of a license by endorsement, or upon issuance or denial of an expedited license pursuant to Section 115.5, whichever occurs first.

(i) A board shall submit to the department for approval, if necessary to implement this section, draft
 regulations necessary to administer this section. These regulations shall be adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(j) (1) This section shall not apply to a board that has a process in place by which an out-of-state licensed applicant in good standing who is married to, or in a domestic partnership or other legal union with, an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States is able to receive expedited, temporary authorization to practice while meeting state-specific requirements for a period of at least one year or is able to receive an expedited license by endorsement with no additional requirements superseding those described in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(2) This section shall apply only to the extent that it does not amend an initiative or violate constitutional requirements.

(k) An applicant for a temporary license pursuant to this section shall not be required to provide, and no board shall collect, a fee for the application or issuance of a temporary license.

(l) For purposes of this section, the term “applicant” refers to an applicant for an individual license and does not refer to applicants for business or entity licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 3.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

115.8.

The Department of Consumer Affairs shall compile information on military and spouse licensure into an annual report for the Legislature, which shall be submitted in conformance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall include all of the following for each license type of each board:

(a) The number of applications for a temporary license submitted by military spouses per fiscal year, pursuant to Section 115.6.

(b) The number of applications for expedited licenses received from honorably discharged military members and military spouses pursuant to Sections 115.4 and 115.5.

(c) The number of licenses issued and denied per fiscal year pursuant to
 Sections 115.4, 115.5, and 115.6.

(d) The number of licenses issued pursuant to Section 115.6 that were suspended or revoked per fiscal year.

(e) The number of applications for waived renewal fees received and granted pursuant to Section 114.3 per fiscal year.

(f) The average length of time between application and issuance of licenses pursuant to Sections 115.4, 115.5, and 115.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

115.9.

The department and each board within the department shall publish information pertinent to all licensing options available to military spouses on the home page of the internet website of the department or board, as applicable, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The process for expediting applications for military spouses.

(b) The availability of temporary licensure, the requirements for obtaining a temporary license, and length of time a temporary license is active.

(c) The requirements for full, permanent licensure by endorsement or credential for
 out-of-state applicants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 693, Sec. 4.   (AB 107)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

115.10.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a servicemember or a spouse of a servicemember.

(2) “Board” means an entity described in Section 101.

(3) “Professional license” means an individual professional license and does not include a business or entity license.

(4) “Registering authority” means a board or the Department of Real Estate, as applicable.

(5) “Spouse” means an individual who is married to, or who is in a domestic partnership or
 other legal union with, a military servicemember.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a registering authority shall register an applicant who satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) The applicant holds a professional license in good standing in another state, district, or territory of the United States that confers on the applicant the authority to practice a profession or vocation within a similar scope of practice as that regulated by the registering authority.

(2) The applicant relocated to this state because of military orders for military service within this state and the applicant submits to the registering authority a copy of the military orders.

(3) The applicant performed at least one activity within the scope and under the authority of
 their professional license during the two years immediately preceding the relocation to this state.

(4) For an applicant who is licensed within the same professional discipline in more than one jurisdiction, both of the following:

(A) The applicant maintains each license in good standing.

(B) The applicant submits to the registering authority written verification from, or documentation printed from an online licensing system for, each jurisdiction that the applicant’s license is in good standing in the jurisdiction.

(5) The applicant submits to the registering authority written verification from, or documentation printed from an online licensing system for, the applicant’s original licensing jurisdiction that the applicant’s license is in good standing
 in that jurisdiction.

(6) For an applicant that is a spouse, the applicant submits evidence to the registering authority that the applicant is married to, or in a domestic partnership or other legal union with, a servicemember who is subject to military orders described in paragraph (2).

(7) The applicant submits to the registering authority their California address of record and an affidavit attesting to both of the following:

(A) The applicant meets all of the requirements for registration under this section.

(B) The information submitted to the registering authority pursuant to this section is accurate to the best of the applicant’s knowledge.

(c) (1) The